Utah statutes.
48-1d-201.   Partnership as entity.

(1)  A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

(2)  A partnership is the same entity regardless of whether the partnership has a statement of qualification in effect under Section 48-1d-1101.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

